Illinois, session 104th, HB4629.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Sections 5-1 and 5-3 and by adding Section 6-40 as 6follows: 7    (235 ILCS 5/5-1)  (from Ch. 43, par. 115)8    Sec. 5-1. Licenses issued by the Illinois Liquor Control 9Commission shall be of the following classes:10    (a) Manufacturer's license - Class 1. Distiller, Class 2. 11Rectifier, Class 3. Brewer, Class 4. First Class Wine 12Manufacturer, Class 5. Second Class Wine Manufacturer, Class 136. First Class Winemaker, Class 7. Second Class Winemaker, 14Class 8. Limited Wine Manufacturer, Class 9. Craft Distiller, 15Class 10. Class 1 Craft Distiller, Class 11. Class 2 Craft 16Distiller, Class 12. Class 1 Brewer, Class 13. Class 2 Brewer, 17Class 14. Class 3 Brewer, 18    (b) Distributor's license,19    (c) Importing Distributor's license,20    (d) Retailer's license,21    (e) Special Event Retailer's license (not-for-profit),22    (f) Railroad license,23    (g) Boat license,  HB4629- 2 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1    (h) Non-Beverage User's license,2    (i) Wine-maker's premises license,3    (j) Airplane license,4    (k) Foreign importer's license,5    (l) Broker's license,6    (m) Non-resident dealer's license,7    (n) Brew Pub license,8    (o) Auction liquor license,9    (p) Caterer retailer license,10    (q) Special use permit license,11    (r) Winery shipper's license,12    (s) Craft distiller tasting permit,13    (t) Brewer warehouse permit, 14    (u) Distilling pub license, 15    (v) Craft distiller warehouse permit,16    (w) Beer showcase permit, . 17    (x) Vintage distilled spirits license. 18    No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other legal 19business entity that is engaged in the manufacturing of wine 20may concurrently obtain and hold a wine-maker's license and a 21wine manufacturer's license.22    (a) A manufacturer's license shall allow the manufacture, 23importation in bulk, storage, distribution and sale of 24alcoholic liquor to persons without the State, as may be 25permitted by law, and to licensees in this State as follows:26    Class 1. A Distiller may make sales and deliveries of   HB4629- 3 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1alcoholic liquor to distillers, rectifiers, importing 2distributors, distributors, and non-beverage users and to no 3other licensees.4    Class 2. A Rectifier, who is not a distiller, as defined 5herein, may make sales and deliveries of alcoholic liquor to 6rectifiers, importing distributors, distributors, retailers, 7and non-beverage users and to no other licensees.8    Class 3. A Brewer may make sales and deliveries of beer to 9importing distributors and distributors and may make sales as 10authorized under subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, 11including any alcoholic liquor that subsection (e) of Section 126-4 authorizes a brewer to sell in its original package only to 13a non-licensee for pick-up by a non-licensee either within the 14interior of the brewery premises or at outside of the brewery 15premises at a curb-side or parking lot adjacent to the brewery 16premises, subject to any local ordinance.17    Class 4. A first class wine-manufacturer may make sales 18and deliveries of up to 50,000 gallons of wine to 19manufacturers, importing distributors and distributors, and to 20no other licensees. If a first-class wine-manufacturer 21manufactures beer, it shall also obtain and shall only be 22eligible for, in addition to any current license, a class 1 23brewer license, shall not manufacture more than 930,000 24gallons of beer per year, and shall not be a member of or 25affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 26produces more than 930,000 gallons of beer per year. If the   HB4629- 4 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1first-class wine-manufacturer manufactures spirits, it shall 2also obtain and shall only be eligible for, in addition to any 3current license, a class 1 craft distiller license, shall not 4manufacture more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year, and 5shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 6indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 50,000 7gallons of spirits per year. A first-class wine-manufacturer 8shall be permitted to sell wine manufactured at the 9first-class wine-manufacturer premises to non-licensees. 10    Class 5. A second class wine Wine manufacturer may make 11sales and deliveries of more than 50,000 gallons of wine to 12manufacturers, importing distributors and distributors and to 13no other licensees.14    Class 6. A first-class wine-maker's license shall allow 15the manufacture of up to 50,000 gallons of wine per year, and 16the storage and sale of such wine to distributors in the State 17and to persons without the State, as may be permitted by law. A 18person who, prior to June 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public 19Act 95-634), is a holder of a first-class wine-maker's license 20and annually produces more than 25,000 gallons of its own wine 21and who distributes its wine to licensed retailers shall cease 22this practice on or before July 1, 2008 in compliance with 23Public Act 95-634. If a first-class wine-maker manufactures 24beer, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, in 25addition to any current license, a class 1 brewer license, 26shall not manufacture more than 930,000 gallons of beer per   HB4629- 5 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly 2or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 930,000 3gallons of beer per year. If the first-class wine-maker 4manufactures spirits, it shall also obtain and shall only be 5eligible for, in addition to any current license, a class 1 6craft distiller license, shall not manufacture more than 750,000 gallons of spirits per year, and shall not be a member 8of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 9that produces more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. A 10first-class wine-maker holding a class 1 brewer license or a 11class 1 craft distiller license shall not be eligible for a 12wine-maker's premises license but shall be permitted to sell 13wine manufactured at the first-class wine-maker premises to 14non-licensees. 15    Class 7. A second-class wine-maker's license shall allow 16the manufacture of up to 150,000 gallons of wine per year, and 17the storage and sale of such wine to distributors in this State 18and to persons without the State, as may be permitted by law. A 19person who, prior to June 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public 20Act 95-634), is a holder of a second-class wine-maker's 21license and annually produces more than 25,000 gallons of its 22own wine and who distributes its wine to licensed retailers 23shall cease this practice on or before July 1, 2008 in 24compliance with Public Act 95-634. If a second-class 25wine-maker manufactures beer, it shall also obtain and shall 26only be eligible for, in addition to any current license, a   HB4629- 6 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1class 2 brewer license, shall not manufacture more than 23,720,000 gallons of beer per year, and shall not be a member 3of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 4that produces more than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per year. If 5a second-class wine-maker manufactures spirits, it shall also 6obtain and shall only be eligible for, in addition to any 7current license, a class 2 craft distiller license, shall not 8manufacture more than 100,000 gallons of spirits per year, and 9shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 10indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 100,000 11gallons of spirits per year. 12    Class 8. A limited wine-manufacturer may make sales and 13deliveries not to exceed 40,000 gallons of wine per year to 14distributors, and to non-licensees in accordance with the 15provisions of this Act.16    Class 9. A craft distiller license, which may only be held 17by a class 1 craft distiller licensee or class 2 craft 18distiller licensee but not held by both a class 1 craft 19distiller licensee and a class 2 craft distiller licensee, 20shall grant all rights conveyed by either: (i) a class 1 craft 21distiller license if the craft distiller holds a class 1 craft 22distiller license; or (ii) a class 2 craft distiller licensee 23if the craft distiller holds a class 2 craft distiller 24license. 25    Class 10. A class 1 craft distiller license, which may 26only be issued to a licensed craft distiller or licensed   HB4629- 7 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1non-resident dealer, shall allow the manufacture of up to 250,000 gallons of spirits per year provided that the class 1 3craft distiller licensee does not manufacture more than a 4combined 50,000 gallons of spirits per year and is not a member 5of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 6that produces more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. If 7a class 1 craft distiller manufactures beer, it shall also 8obtain and shall only be eligible for, in addition to any 9current license, a class 1 brewer license, shall not 10manufacture more than 930,000 gallons of beer per year, and 11shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 12indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 930,000 13gallons of beer per year. If a class 1 craft distiller 14manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and shall only be 15eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 16first-class wine-manufacturer license or a first-class 17wine-maker's license, shall not manufacture more than 50,000 18gallons of wine per year, and shall not be a member of or 19affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 20produces more than 50,000 gallons of wine per year. A class 1 21craft distiller licensee may make sales and deliveries to 22importing distributors and distributors and to retail 23licensees in accordance with the conditions set forth in 24paragraph (19) of subsection (a) of Section 3-12 of this Act. 25However, the aggregate amount of spirits sold to non-licensees 26and sold or delivered to retail licensees may not exceed 5,000   HB4629- 8 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1gallons per year.2    A class 1 craft distiller licensee may sell up to 5,000 3gallons of such spirits to non-licensees to the extent 4permitted by any exemption approved by the State Commission 5pursuant to Section 6-4 of this Act. A class 1 craft distiller 6license holder may store such spirits at a non-contiguous 7licensed location, but at no time shall a class 1 craft 8distiller license holder directly or indirectly produce in the 9aggregate more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. 10    A class 1 craft distiller licensee may hold more than one 11class 1 craft distiller's license. However, a class 1 craft 12distiller that holds more than one class 1 craft distiller 13license shall not manufacture, in the aggregate, more than 1450,000 gallons of spirits by distillation per year and shall 15not sell, in the aggregate, more than 5,000 gallons of such 16spirits to non-licensees in accordance with an exemption 17approved by the State Commission pursuant to Section 6-4 of 18this Act. 19    Class 11. A class 2 craft distiller license, which may 20only be issued to a licensed craft distiller or licensed 21non-resident dealer, shall allow the manufacture of up to 22100,000 gallons of spirits per year provided that the class 2 23craft distiller licensee does not manufacture more than a 24combined 100,000 gallons of spirits per year and is not a 25member of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a 26manufacturer that produces more than 100,000 gallons of   HB4629- 9 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1spirits per year. If a class 2 craft distiller manufactures 2beer, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, in 3addition to any current license, a class 2 brewer license, 4shall not manufacture more than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per 5year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly 6or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 73,720,000 gallons of beer per year. If a class 2 craft 8distiller manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and shall 9only be eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 10second-class wine-maker's license, shall not manufacture more 11than 150,000 gallons of wine per year, and shall not be a 12member of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a 13manufacturer that produces more than 150,000 gallons of wine 14per year. A class 2 craft distiller licensee may make sales and 15deliveries to importing distributors and distributors, but 16shall not make sales or deliveries to any other licensee. If 17the State Commission provides prior approval, a class 2 craft 18distiller licensee may annually transfer up to 100,000 gallons 19of spirits manufactured by that class 2 craft distiller 20licensee to the premises of a licensed class 2 craft distiller 21wholly owned and operated by the same licensee. A class 2 craft 22distiller may transfer spirits to a distilling pub wholly 23owned and operated by the class 2 craft distiller subject to 24the following limitations and restrictions: (i) the transfer 25shall not annually exceed more than 5,000 gallons; (ii) the 26annual amount transferred shall reduce the distilling pub's   HB4629- 10 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1annual permitted production limit; (iii) all spirits 2transferred shall be subject to Article VIII of this Act; (iv) 3a written record shall be maintained by the distiller and 4distilling pub specifying the amount, date of delivery, and 5receipt of the product by the distilling pub; and (v) the 6distilling pub shall be located no farther than 80 miles from 7the class 2 craft distiller's licensed location. 8    A class 2 craft distiller shall, prior to transferring 9spirits to a distilling pub wholly owned by the class 2 craft 10distiller, furnish a written notice to the State Commission of 11intent to transfer spirits setting forth the name and address 12of the distilling pub and shall annually submit to the State 13Commission a verified report identifying the total gallons of 14spirits transferred to the distilling pub wholly owned by the 15class 2 craft distiller. 16    A class 2 craft distiller license holder may store such 17spirits at a non-contiguous licensed location, but at no time 18shall a class 2 craft distiller license holder directly or 19indirectly produce in the aggregate more than 100,000 gallons 20of spirits per year. 21    Class 12. A class 1 brewer license, which may only be 22issued to a licensed brewer or licensed non-resident dealer, 23shall allow the manufacture of up to 930,000 gallons of beer 24per year provided that the class 1 brewer licensee does not 25manufacture more than a combined 930,000 gallons of beer per 26year and is not a member of or affiliated with, directly or   HB4629- 11 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 930,000 2gallons of beer per year. If a class 1 brewer manufactures 3spirits, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, 4in addition to any current license, a class 1 craft distiller 5license, shall not manufacture more than 50,000 gallons of 6spirits per year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated 7with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces 8more than 50,000 gallons of spirits per year. If a class 1 9craft brewer manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and shall 10only be eligible for, in addition to any current license, a 11first-class wine-manufacturer license or a first-class 12wine-maker's license, shall not manufacture more than 50,000 13gallons of wine per year, and shall not be a member of or 14affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 15produces more than 50,000 gallons of wine per year. A class 1 16brewer licensee may make sales and deliveries to importing 17distributors and distributors and to retail licensees in 18accordance with the conditions set forth in paragraph (18) of 19subsection (a) of Section 3-12 of this Act. If the State 20Commission provides prior approval, a class 1 brewer may 21annually transfer up to 930,000 gallons of beer manufactured 22by that class 1 brewer to the premises of a licensed class 1 23brewer wholly owned and operated by the same licensee. 24    Class 13. A class 2 brewer license, which may only be 25issued to a licensed brewer or licensed non-resident dealer, 26shall allow the manufacture of up to 3,720,000 gallons of beer   HB4629- 12 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1per year provided that the class 2 brewer licensee does not 2manufacture more than a combined 3,720,000 gallons of beer per 3year and is not a member of or affiliated with, directly or 4indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 3,720,000 5gallons of beer per year. If a class 2 brewer manufactures 6spirits, it shall also obtain and shall only be eligible for, 7in addition to any current license, a class 2 craft distiller 8license, shall not manufacture more than 100,000 gallons of 9spirits per year, and shall not be a member of or affiliated 10with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces 11more than 100,000 gallons of spirits per year. If a class 2 12craft distiller manufactures wine, it shall also obtain and 13shall only be eligible for, in addition to any current 14license, a second-class wine-maker's license, shall not 15manufacture more than 150,000 gallons of wine per year, and 16shall not be a member of or affiliated with, directly or 17indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 150,000 18gallons of wine a year. A class 2 brewer licensee may make 19sales and deliveries to importing distributors and 20distributors, but shall not make sales or deliveries to any 21other licensee. If the State Commission provides prior 22approval, a class 2 brewer licensee may annually transfer up 23to 3,720,000 gallons of beer manufactured by that class 2 24brewer licensee to the premises of a licensed class 2 brewer 25wholly owned and operated by the same licensee.26    A class 2 brewer may transfer beer to a brew pub wholly   HB4629- 13 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1owned and operated by the class 2 brewer subject to the 2following limitations and restrictions: (i) the transfer shall 3not annually exceed more than 31,000 gallons; (ii) the annual 4amount transferred shall reduce the brew pub's annual 5permitted production limit; (iii) all beer transferred shall 6be subject to Article VIII of this Act; (iv) a written record 7shall be maintained by the brewer and brew pub specifying the 8amount, date of delivery, and receipt of the product by the 9brew pub; and (v) the brew pub shall be located no farther than 1080 miles from the class 2 brewer's licensed location. 11    A class 2 brewer shall, prior to transferring beer to a 12brew pub wholly owned by the class 2 brewer, furnish a written 13notice to the State Commission of intent to transfer beer 14setting forth the name and address of the brew pub and shall 15annually submit to the State Commission a verified report 16identifying the total gallons of beer transferred to the brew 17pub wholly owned by the class 2 brewer. 18    Class 14. A class 3 brewer license, which may be issued to 19a brewer or a non-resident dealer, shall allow the manufacture 20of no more than 465,000 gallons of beer per year and no more 21than 155,000 gallons at a single brewery premises, and shall 22allow the sale of no more than 6,200 gallons of beer from each 23in-state or out-of-state class 3 brewery premises, or 18,600 24gallons in the aggregate, to retail licensees, class 1 25brewers, class 2 brewers, and class 3 brewers as long as the 26class 3 brewer licensee does not manufacture more than a   HB4629- 14 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1combined 465,000 gallons of beer per year and is not a member 2of or affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer 3that produces more than 465,000 gallons of beer per year to 4make sales to importing distributors, distributors, retail 5licensees, brewers, class 1 brewers, class 2 brewers, and 6class 3 brewers in accordance with the conditions set forth in 7paragraph (20) of subsection (a) of Section 3-12. If the State 8Commission provides prior approval, a class 3 brewer may 9annually transfer up to 155,000 gallons of beer manufactured 10by that class 3 brewer to the premises of a licensed class 3 11brewer wholly owned and operated by the same licensee. A class 123 brewer shall manufacture beer at the brewer's class 3 13designated licensed premises, and may sell beer as otherwise 14provided in this Act. 15    (a-1) A manufacturer that which is licensed in this State 16to make sales or deliveries of alcoholic liquor to licensed 17distributors or importing distributors and which enlists 18agents, representatives, or individuals acting on its behalf 19who contact licensed retailers on a regular and continual 20basis in this State must register those agents, 21representatives, or persons acting on its behalf with the 22State Commission.23    Registration of agents, representatives, or persons acting 24on behalf of a manufacturer is fulfilled by submitting a form 25to the State Commission. The form shall be developed by the 26State Commission and shall include the name and address of the   HB4629- 15 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1applicant, the name and address of the manufacturer he or she 2represents, the territory or areas assigned to sell to or 3discuss pricing terms of alcoholic liquor, and any other 4questions deemed appropriate and necessary. All statements in 5the forms required to be made by law or by rule shall be deemed 6material, and any person who knowingly misstates any material 7fact under oath in an application is guilty of a Class B 8misdemeanor. Fraud, misrepresentation, false statements, 9misleading statements, evasions, or suppression of material 10facts in the securing of a registration are grounds for 11suspension or revocation of the registration. The State 12Commission shall post a list of registered agents on the State 13Commission's website.14    (b) A distributor's license shall allow (i) the wholesale 15purchase and storage of alcoholic liquors and sale of 16alcoholic liquors to licensees in this State and to persons 17without the State, as may be permitted by law; (ii) the sale of 18beer, cider, mead, or any combination thereof to brewers, 19class 1 brewers, and class 2 brewers that, pursuant to 20subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, sell beer, cider, 21mead, or any combination thereof to non-licensees at their 22breweries; (iii) the sale of vermouth to class 1 craft 23distillers and class 2 craft distillers that, pursuant to 24subsection (e) of Section 6-4 of this Act, sell spirits, 25vermouth, or both spirits and vermouth to non-licensees at 26their distilleries; or (iv) as otherwise provided in this Act.   HB4629- 16 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1No person licensed as a distributor shall be granted a 2non-resident dealer's license.3    (c) An importing distributor's license may be issued to 4and held by those only who are duly licensed distributors, 5upon the filing of an application by a duly licensed 6distributor, with the State Commission and the State 7Commission shall, without the payment of any fee, immediately 8issue such importing distributor's license to the applicant, 9which shall allow the importation of alcoholic liquor by the 10licensee into this State from any point in the United States 11outside this State, and the purchase of alcoholic liquor in 12barrels, casks, or other bulk containers and the bottling of 13such alcoholic liquors before resale thereof, but all bottles 14or containers so filled shall be sealed, labeled, stamped, and 15otherwise made to comply with all provisions, rules, and 16regulations governing manufacturers in the preparation and 17bottling of alcoholic liquors. The importing distributor's 18license shall permit such licensee to purchase alcoholic 19liquor from Illinois licensed non-resident dealers and foreign 20importers only. No person licensed as an importing distributor 21shall be granted a non-resident dealer's license.22    (d) A retailer's license shall allow the licensee to sell 23and offer for sale at retail, only in the premises specified in 24the license, alcoholic liquor for use or consumption, but not 25for resale in any form. Except as provided in Section 6-16, 266-29, or 6-29.1, nothing in this Act shall deny, limit,   HB4629- 17 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1remove, or restrict the ability of a holder of a retailer's 2license to transfer or ship alcoholic liquor to the purchaser 3for use or consumption subject to any applicable local law or 4ordinance. For the purposes of this Section, "shipping" means 5the movement of alcoholic liquor from a licensed retailer to a 6consumer via a common carrier. Except as provided in Section 76-16, 6-29, or 6-29.1, nothing in this Act shall deny, limit, 8remove, or restrict the ability of a holder of a retailer's 9license to deliver alcoholic liquor to the purchaser for use 10or consumption. The delivery shall be made only within 12 11hours from the time the alcoholic liquor leaves the licensed 12premises of the retailer for delivery. For the purposes of 13this Section, "delivery" means the movement of alcoholic 14liquor purchased from a licensed retailer to a consumer 15through the following methods:16        (1) delivery within licensed retailer's parking lot, 17    including curbside, for pickup by the consumer;18        (2) delivery by an owner, officer, director, 19    shareholder, or employee of the licensed retailer; or20        (3) delivery by a third-party contractor, independent 21    contractor, or agent with whom the licensed retailer has 22    contracted to make deliveries of alcoholic liquors. 23    Under paragraph subsection (1), (2), or (3), delivery 24shall not include the use of common carriers. 25    Any retail license issued to a manufacturer shall only 26permit the manufacturer to sell beer at retail on the premises   HB4629- 18 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1actually occupied by the manufacturer. For the purpose of 2further describing the type of business conducted at a retail 3licensed premises, a retailer's licensee may be designated by 4the State Commission as (i) an on premise consumption 5retailer, (ii) an off premise sale retailer, or (iii) a 6combined on premise consumption and off premise sale retailer. 7    Except for a municipality with a population of more than 81,000,000 inhabitants, a home rule unit may not regulate the 9delivery of alcoholic liquor inconsistent with this 10subsection. This paragraph is a limitation under subsection 11(i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on 12the concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and 13functions exercised by the State. A non-home rule municipality 14may not regulate the delivery of alcoholic liquor inconsistent 15with this subsection. 16    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 17(d), a retail licensee may sell alcoholic liquors to a special 18event retailer licensee for resale to the extent permitted 19under subsection (e).20    (e) A special event retailer's license (not-for-profit) 21shall permit the licensee to purchase alcoholic liquors from 22an Illinois licensed distributor (unless the licensee 23purchases less than $500 of alcoholic liquors for the special 24event, in which case the licensee may purchase the alcoholic 25liquors from a licensed retailer) and shall allow the licensee 26to sell and offer for sale, at retail, alcoholic liquors for   HB4629- 19 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1use or consumption, but not for resale in any form and only at 2the location and on the specific dates designated for the 3special event in the license. An applicant for a special event 4retailer license must (i) furnish with the application: (A) a 5resale number issued under Section 2c of the Retailers' 6Occupation Tax Act or evidence that the applicant is 7registered under Section 2a of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 8Act, (B) a current, valid exemption identification number 9issued under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 10and a certification to the State Commission that the purchase 11of alcoholic liquors will be a tax-exempt purchase, or (C) a 12statement that the applicant is not registered under Section 132a of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, does not hold a resale 14number under Section 2c of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 15and does not hold an exemption number under Section 1g of the 16Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, in which event the State 17Commission shall set forth on the special event retailer's 18license a statement to that effect; (ii) submit with the 19application proof satisfactory to the State Commission that 20the applicant will provide dram shop liability insurance in 21the maximum limits; and (iii) show proof satisfactory to the 22State Commission that the applicant has obtained local 23authority approval.24    Nothing in this Act prohibits an Illinois licensed 25distributor from offering credit or a refund for unused, 26salable alcoholic liquors to a holder of a special event   HB4629- 20 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1retailer's license or the special event retailer's licensee 2from accepting the credit or refund of alcoholic liquors at 3the conclusion of the event specified in the license.4    (f) A railroad license shall permit the licensee to import 5alcoholic liquors into this State from any point in the United 6States outside this State and to store such alcoholic liquors 7in this State; to make wholesale purchases of alcoholic 8liquors directly from manufacturers, foreign importers, 9distributors and importing distributors from within or outside 10this State; and to store such alcoholic liquors in this State; 11provided that the above powers may be exercised only in 12connection with the importation, purchase or storage of 13alcoholic liquors to be sold or dispensed on a club, buffet, 14lounge, or dining car operated on an electric, gas, or steam 15railway in this State; and provided further, that railroad 16licensees exercising the above powers shall be subject to all 17provisions of Article VIII of this Act as applied to importing 18distributors. A railroad license shall also permit the 19licensee to sell or dispense alcoholic liquors on any club, 20buffet, lounge, or dining car operated on an electric, gas, or 21steam railway regularly operated by a common carrier in this 22State, but shall not permit the sale for resale of any 23alcoholic liquors to any licensee within this State. A license 24shall be obtained for each car in which such sales are made.25    (g) A boat license shall allow the sale of alcoholic 26liquor in individual drinks, on any passenger boat regularly   HB4629- 21 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1operated as a common carrier on navigable waters in this State 2or on any riverboat operated under the Illinois Gambling Act, 3which boat or riverboat maintains a public dining room or 4restaurant thereon.5    (h) A non-beverage user's license shall allow the licensee 6to purchase alcoholic liquor from a licensed manufacturer or 7importing distributor, without the imposition of any tax upon 8the business of such licensed manufacturer or importing 9distributor as to such alcoholic liquor to be used by such 10licensee solely for the non-beverage purposes set forth in 11subsection (a) of Section 8-1 of this Act, and such licenses 12shall be divided and classified and shall permit the purchase, 13possession, and use of limited and stated quantities of 14alcoholic liquor as follows:15Class 1, not to exceed ......................... 500 gallons 16Class 2, not to exceed ....................... 1,000 gallons 17Class 3, not to exceed ....................... 5,000 gallons 18Class 4, not to exceed ...................... 10,000 gallons 19Class 5, not to exceed ....................... 50,000 gallons20    (i) A wine-maker's premises license shall allow a licensee 21that concurrently holds a first-class wine-maker's license to 22sell and offer for sale at retail in the premises specified in 23such license not more than 50,000 gallons of the first-class 24wine-maker's wine that is made at the first-class wine-maker's 25licensed premises per year for use or consumption, but not for 26resale in any form. A wine-maker's premises license shall   HB4629- 22 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1allow a licensee who concurrently holds a second-class 2wine-maker's license to sell and offer for sale at retail in 3the premises specified in such license up to 100,000 gallons 4of the second-class wine-maker's wine that is made at the 5second-class wine-maker's licensed premises per year for use 6or consumption but not for resale in any form. A first-class 7wine-maker that concurrently holds a class 1 brewer license or 8a class 1 craft distiller license shall not be eligible to hold 9a wine-maker's premises license. A wine-maker's premises 10license shall allow a licensee that concurrently holds a 11first-class wine-maker's license or a second-class 12wine-maker's license to sell and offer for sale at retail at 13the premises specified in the wine-maker's premises license, 14for use or consumption but not for resale in any form, any 15beer, wine, and spirits purchased from a licensed distributor. 16Upon approval from the State Commission, a wine-maker's 17premises license shall allow the licensee to sell and offer 18for sale at (i) the wine-maker's licensed premises and (ii) at 19up to 2 additional locations for use and consumption and not 20for resale. Each location shall require additional licensing 21per location as specified in Section 5-3 of this Act. A 22wine-maker's premises licensee shall secure liquor liability 23insurance coverage in an amount at least equal to the maximum 24liability amounts set forth in subsection (a) of Section 6-21 25of this Act. 26    (j) An airplane license shall permit the licensee to   HB4629- 23 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1import alcoholic liquors into this State from any point in the 2United States outside this State and to store such alcoholic 3liquors in this State; to make wholesale purchases of 4alcoholic liquors directly from manufacturers, foreign 5importers, distributors, and importing distributors from 6within or outside this State; and to store such alcoholic 7liquors in this State; provided that the above powers may be 8exercised only in connection with the importation, purchase, 9or storage of alcoholic liquors to be sold or dispensed on an 10airplane; and provided further, that airplane licensees 11exercising the above powers shall be subject to all provisions 12of Article VIII of this Act as applied to importing 13distributors. An airplane licensee shall also permit the sale 14or dispensing of alcoholic liquors on any passenger airplane 15regularly operated by a common carrier in this State, but 16shall not permit the sale for resale of any alcoholic liquors 17to any licensee within this State. A single airplane license 18shall be required of an airline company if liquor service is 19provided on board aircraft in this State. The annual fee for 20such license shall be as determined in Section 5-3.21    (k) A foreign importer's license shall permit such 22licensee to purchase alcoholic liquor from Illinois licensed 23non-resident dealers only, and to import alcoholic liquor 24other than in bulk from any point outside the United States and 25to sell such alcoholic liquor to Illinois licensed importing 26distributors and to no one else in Illinois; provided that (i)   HB4629- 24 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1the foreign importer registers with the State Commission every 2brand of alcoholic liquor that it proposes to sell to Illinois 3licensees during the license period, (ii) the foreign importer 4complies with all of the provisions of Section 6-9 of this Act 5with respect to registration of such Illinois licensees as may 6be granted the right to sell such brands at wholesale, and 7(iii) the foreign importer complies with the provisions of 8Sections 6-5 and 6-6 of this Act to the same extent that these 9provisions apply to manufacturers.10    (l) (i) A broker's license shall be required of all 11persons who solicit orders for, offer to sell, or offer to 12supply alcoholic liquor to retailers in the State of Illinois, 13or who offer to retailers to ship or cause to be shipped or to 14make contact with distillers, craft distillers, rectifiers, 15brewers or manufacturers or any other party within or without 16the State of Illinois in order that alcoholic liquors be 17shipped to a distributor, importing distributor, or foreign 18importer, whether such solicitation or offer is consummated 19within or without the State of Illinois.20    No holder of a retailer's license issued by the Illinois 21Liquor Control Commission shall purchase or receive any 22alcoholic liquor, the order for which was solicited or offered 23for sale to such retailer by a broker unless the broker is the 24holder of a valid broker's license.25    The broker shall, upon the acceptance by a retailer of the 26broker's solicitation of an order or offer to sell or supply or   HB4629- 25 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1deliver or have delivered alcoholic liquors, promptly forward 2to the Illinois Liquor Control Commission a notification of 3said transaction in such form as the State Commission may by 4regulations prescribe.5    (ii) A broker's license shall be required of a person 6within this State, other than a retail licensee, who, for a fee 7or commission, promotes, solicits, or accepts orders for 8alcoholic liquor, for use or consumption and not for resale, 9to be shipped from this State and delivered to residents 10outside of this State by an express company, common carrier, 11or contract carrier. This Section does not apply to any person 12who promotes, solicits, or accepts orders for wine as 13specifically authorized in Section 6-29 of this Act.14    A broker's license under this subsection (l) shall not 15entitle the holder to buy or sell any alcoholic liquors for his 16own account or to take or deliver title to such alcoholic 17liquors.18    This subsection (l) shall not apply to distributors, 19employees of distributors, or employees of a manufacturer who 20has registered the trademark, brand, or name of the alcoholic 21liquor pursuant to Section 6-9 of this Act, and who regularly 22sells such alcoholic liquor in the State of Illinois only to 23its registrants thereunder.24    Any agent, representative, or person subject to 25registration pursuant to subsection (a-1) of this Section 26shall not be eligible to receive a broker's license.  HB4629- 26 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1    (m) A non-resident dealer's license shall permit such 2licensee to ship into and warehouse alcoholic liquor into this 3State from any point outside of this State, and to sell such 4alcoholic liquor to Illinois licensed foreign importers and 5importing distributors and to no one else in this State; 6provided that (i) said non-resident dealer shall register with 7the Illinois Liquor Control Commission each and every brand of 8alcoholic liquor which it proposes to sell to Illinois 9licensees during the license period, (ii) it shall comply with 10all of the provisions of Section 6-9 hereof with respect to 11registration of such Illinois licensees as may be granted the 12right to sell such brands at wholesale by duly filing such 13registration statement, thereby authorizing the non-resident 14dealer to proceed to sell such brands at wholesale, and (iii) 15the non-resident dealer shall comply with the provisions of 16Sections 6-5 and 6-6 of this Act to the same extent that these 17provisions apply to manufacturers. No person licensed as a 18non-resident dealer shall be granted a distributor's or 19importing distributor's license.20    (n) A brew pub license shall allow the licensee to only (i) 21manufacture up to 155,000 gallons of beer per year only on the 22premises specified in the license, (ii) make sales of the beer 23manufactured on the premises or, with the approval of the 24State Commission, beer manufactured on another brew pub 25licensed premises that is wholly owned and operated by the 26same licensee to importing distributors, distributors, and to   HB4629- 27 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1non-licensees for use and consumption, (iii) store the beer 2upon the premises, (iv) sell and offer for sale at retail from 3the licensed premises for off-premises consumption no more 4than 155,000 gallons per year so long as such sales are only 5made in-person, (v) sell and offer for sale at retail for use 6and consumption on the premises specified in the license any 7form of alcoholic liquor purchased from a licensed distributor 8or importing distributor, (vi) with the prior approval of the 9State Commission, annually transfer no more than 155,000 10gallons of beer manufactured on the premises to a licensed 11brew pub wholly owned and operated by the same licensee, and 12(vii) notwithstanding item (i) of this subsection, brew pubs 13wholly owned and operated by the same licensee may combine 14each location's production limit of 155,000 gallons of beer 15per year and allocate the aggregate total between the wholly 16owned, operated, and licensed locations.17    A brew pub licensee shall not under any circumstance sell 18or offer for sale beer manufactured by the brew pub licensee to 19retail licensees. 20    A person who holds a class 2 brewer license may 21simultaneously hold a brew pub license if the class 2 brewer 22(i) does not, under any circumstance, sell or offer for sale 23beer manufactured by the class 2 brewer to retail licensees; 24(ii) does not hold more than 3 brew pub licenses in this State; 25(iii) does not manufacture more than a combined 3,720,000 26gallons of beer per year, including the beer manufactured at   HB4629- 28 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1the brew pub; and (iv) is not a member of or affiliated with, 2directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 33,720,000 gallons of beer per year or any other alcoholic 4liquor.5    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, a 6licensed brewer, class 2 brewer, or non-resident dealer who 7before July 1, 2015 manufactured less than 3,720,000 gallons 8of beer per year and held a brew pub license on or before July 91, 2015 may (i) continue to qualify for and hold that brew pub 10license for the licensed premises and (ii) manufacture more 11than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per year and continue to 12qualify for and hold that brew pub license if that brewer, 13class 2 brewer, or non-resident dealer does not simultaneously 14hold a class 1 brewer license and is not a member of or 15affiliated with, directly or indirectly, a manufacturer that 16produces more than 3,720,000 gallons of beer per year or that 17produces any other alcoholic liquor. 18    A brew pub licensee may apply for a class 3 brewer license 19and, upon meeting all applicable qualifications of this Act 20and relinquishing all commonly owned brew pub or retail 21licenses, shall be issued a class 3 brewer license. Nothing in 22this Act shall prohibit the issuance of a class 3 brewer 23license if the applicant:24        (1) has a valid retail license on or before May 1, 25    2021;26        (2) has an ownership interest in at least 2 two brew   HB4629- 29 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1    pubs licenses on or before May 1, 2021;2        (3) the brew pub licensee applies for a class 3 brewer 3    license on or before October 1, 2022 and relinquishes all 4    commonly owned brew pub licenses; and5        (4) relinquishes all commonly owned retail licenses on 6    or before December 31, 2022.7    If a brew pub licensee is issued a class 3 brewer license, 8the class 3 brewer license shall expire on the same date as the 9existing brew pub license and the State Commission shall not 10require a class 3 brewer licensee to obtain a brewer license, 11or, in the alternative, to pay a fee for a brewer license, 12until the date the brew pub license of the applicant would have 13expired. 14    (o) A caterer retailer license shall allow the holder to 15serve alcoholic liquors as an incidental part of a food 16service that serves prepared meals which excludes the serving 17of snacks as the primary meal, either on or off-site whether 18licensed or unlicensed. A caterer retailer license shall allow 19the holder, a distributor, or an importing distributor to 20transfer any inventory to and from the holder's retail 21premises and shall allow the holder to purchase alcoholic 22liquor from a distributor or importing distributor to be 23delivered directly to an off-site event.24    Nothing in this Act prohibits a distributor or importing 25distributor from offering credit or a refund for unused, 26salable beer to a holder of a caterer retailer license or a   HB4629- 30 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1caterer retailer licensee from accepting a credit or refund 2for unused, salable beer, in the event an act of God is the 3sole reason an off-site event is canceled cancelled and if: 4(i) the holder of a caterer retailer license has not 5transferred alcoholic liquor from its caterer retailer 6premises to an off-site location; (ii) the distributor or 7importing distributor offers the credit or refund for the 8unused, salable beer that it delivered to the off-site 9premises and not for any unused, salable beer that the 10distributor or importing distributor delivered to the caterer 11retailer's premises; and (iii) the unused, salable beer would 12likely spoil if transferred to the caterer retailer's 13premises. A caterer retailer license shall allow the holder to 14transfer any inventory from any off-site location to its 15caterer retailer premises at the conclusion of an off-site 16event or engage a distributor or importing distributor to 17transfer any inventory from any off-site location to its 18caterer retailer premises at the conclusion of an off-site 19event, provided that the distributor or importing distributor 20issues bona fide charges to the caterer retailer licensee for 21fuel, labor, and delivery and the distributor or importing 22distributor collects payment from the caterer retailer 23licensee prior to the distributor or importing distributor 24transferring inventory to the caterer retailer premises.25    For purposes of this subsection (o), an "act of God" means 26an unforeseeable event, such as a rain or snow storm, hail, a   HB4629- 31 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1flood, or a similar event, that is the sole cause of the 2cancellation of an off-site, outdoor event.3    (p) An auction liquor license shall allow the licensee to 4sell and offer for sale at auction wine and spirits for use or 5consumption, or for resale by an Illinois liquor licensee in 6accordance with provisions of this Act. An auction liquor 7license will be issued to a person and it will permit the 8auction liquor licensee to hold the auction anywhere in the 9State. An auction liquor license must be obtained for each 10auction at least 14 days in advance of the auction date.11    (q) A special use permit license shall allow an Illinois 12licensed retailer to transfer a portion of its alcoholic 13liquor inventory from its retail licensed premises to the 14premises specified in the license hereby created; to purchase 15alcoholic liquor from a distributor or importing distributor 16to be delivered directly to the location specified in the 17license hereby created; and to sell or offer for sale at 18retail, only in the premises specified in the license hereby 19created, the transferred or delivered alcoholic liquor for use 20or consumption, but not for resale in any form. A special use 21permit license may be granted for the following time periods: 22one day or less; 2 or more days to a maximum of 15 days per 23location in any 12-month period. An applicant for the special 24use permit license must also submit with the application proof 25satisfactory to the State Commission that the applicant will 26provide dram shop liability insurance to the maximum limits   HB4629- 32 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1and have local authority approval.2    A special use permit license shall allow the holder to 3transfer any inventory from the holder's special use premises 4to its retail premises at the conclusion of the special use 5event or engage a distributor or importing distributor to 6transfer any inventory from the holder's special use premises 7to its retail premises at the conclusion of an off-site event, 8provided that the distributor or importing distributor issues 9bona fide charges to the special use permit licensee for fuel, 10labor, and delivery and the distributor or importing 11distributor collects payment from the retail licensee prior to 12the distributor or importing distributor transferring 13inventory to the retail premises.14    Nothing in this Act prohibits a distributor or importing 15distributor from offering credit or a refund for unused, 16salable beer to a special use permit licensee or a special use 17permit licensee from accepting a credit or refund for unused, 18salable beer at the conclusion of the event specified in the 19license if: (i) the holder of the special use permit license 20has not transferred alcoholic liquor from its retail licensed 21premises to the premises specified in the special use permit 22license; (ii) the distributor or importing distributor offers 23the credit or refund for the unused, salable beer that it 24delivered to the premises specified in the special use permit 25license and not for any unused, salable beer that the 26distributor or importing distributor delivered to the   HB4629- 33 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1retailer's premises; and (iii) the unused, salable beer would 2likely spoil if transferred to the retailer premises.3    (r) A winery shipper's license shall allow a person with a 4first-class or second-class wine manufacturer's license, a 5first-class or second-class wine-maker's license, or a limited 6wine manufacturer's license or who is licensed to make wine 7under the laws of another state to ship wine made by that 8licensee directly to a resident of this State who is 21 years 9of age or older for that resident's personal use and not for 10resale. Prior to receiving a winery shipper's license, an 11applicant for the license must provide the State Commission 12with a true copy of its current license in any state in which 13it is licensed as a manufacturer of wine. An applicant for a 14winery shipper's license must also complete an application 15form that provides any other information the State Commission 16deems necessary. The application form shall include all 17addresses from which the applicant for a winery shipper's 18license intends to ship wine, including the name and address 19of any third party, except for a common carrier, authorized to 20ship wine on behalf of the manufacturer. The application form 21shall include an acknowledgment acknowledgement consenting to 22the jurisdiction of the State Commission, the Illinois 23Department of Revenue, and the courts of this State concerning 24the enforcement of this Act and any related laws, rules, and 25regulations, including authorizing the Department of Revenue 26and the State Commission to conduct audits for the purpose of   HB4629- 34 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1ensuring compliance with Public Act 95-634, and an 2acknowledgment acknowledgement that the wine manufacturer is 3in compliance with Section 6-2 of this Act. Any third party, 4except for a common carrier, authorized to ship wine on behalf 5of a first-class or second-class wine manufacturer's licensee, 6a first-class or second-class wine-maker's licensee, a limited 7wine manufacturer's licensee, or a person who is licensed to 8make wine under the laws of another state shall also be 9disclosed by the winery shipper's licensee, and a copy of the 10written appointment of the third-party wine provider, except 11for a common carrier, to the wine manufacturer shall be filed 12with the State Commission as a supplement to the winery 13shipper's license application or any renewal thereof. The 14winery shipper's license holder shall affirm under penalty of 15perjury, as part of the winery shipper's license application 16or renewal, that he or she only ships wine, either directly or 17indirectly through a third-party provider, from the licensee's 18own production.19    Except for a common carrier, a third-party provider 20shipping wine on behalf of a winery shipper's license holder 21is the agent of the winery shipper's license holder and, as 22such, a winery shipper's license holder is responsible for the 23acts and omissions of the third-party provider acting on 24behalf of the license holder. A third-party provider, except 25for a common carrier, that engages in shipping wine into 26Illinois on behalf of a winery shipper's license holder shall   HB4629- 35 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1consent to the jurisdiction of the State Commission and the 2State. Any third-party, except for a common carrier, holding 3such an appointment shall, by February 1 of each calendar year 4and upon request by the State Commission or the Department of 5Revenue, file with the State Commission a statement detailing 6each shipment made to an Illinois resident. The statement 7shall include the name and address of the third-party provider 8filing the statement, the time period covered by the 9statement, and the following information: 10        (1) the name, address, and license number of the 11    winery shipper on whose behalf the shipment was made;12        (2) the quantity of the products delivered; and13        (3) the date and address of the shipment. 14If the Department of Revenue or the State Commission requests 15a statement under this paragraph, the third-party provider 16must provide that statement no later than 30 days after the 17request is made. Any books, records, supporting papers, and 18documents containing information and data relating to a 19statement under this paragraph shall be kept and preserved for 20a period of 3 years, unless their destruction sooner is 21authorized, in writing, by the Director of Revenue, and shall 22be open and available to inspection by the Director of Revenue 23or the State Commission or any duly authorized officer, agent, 24or employee of the State Commission or the Department of 25Revenue, at all times during business hours of the day. Any 26person who violates any provision of this paragraph or any   HB4629- 36 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1rule of the State Commission for the administration and 2enforcement of the provisions of this paragraph is guilty of a 3Class C misdemeanor. In case of a continuing violation, each 4day's continuance thereof shall be a separate and distinct 5offense. 6    The State Commission shall adopt rules as soon as 7practicable to implement the requirements of Public Act 99-904 8and shall adopt rules prohibiting any such third-party 9appointment of a third-party provider, except for a common 10carrier, that has been deemed by the State Commission to have 11violated the provisions of this Act with regard to any winery 12shipper licensee.13    A winery shipper licensee must pay to the Department of 14Revenue the State liquor gallonage tax under Section 8-1 for 15all wine that is sold by the licensee and shipped to a person 16in this State. For the purposes of Section 8-1, a winery 17shipper licensee shall be taxed in the same manner as a 18manufacturer of wine. A licensee who is not otherwise required 19to register under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act must 20register under the Use Tax Act to collect and remit use tax to 21the Department of Revenue for all gallons of wine that are sold 22by the licensee and shipped to persons in this State. If a 23licensee fails to remit the tax imposed under this Act in 24accordance with the provisions of Article VIII of this Act, 25the winery shipper's license shall be revoked in accordance 26with the provisions of Article VII of this Act. If a licensee   HB4629- 37 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1fails to properly register and remit tax under the Use Tax Act 2or the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act for all wine that is sold 3by the winery shipper and shipped to persons in this State, the 4winery shipper's license shall be revoked in accordance with 5the provisions of Article VII of this Act.6    A winery shipper licensee must collect, maintain, and 7submit to the State Commission on a semi-annual basis the 8total number of cases per resident of wine shipped to 9residents of this State. A winery shipper licensed under this 10subsection (r) must comply with the requirements of Section 116-29 of this Act.12    Pursuant to paragraph (5.1) or (5.3) of subsection (a) of 13Section 3-12, the State Commission may receive, respond to, 14and investigate any complaint and impose any of the remedies 15specified in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 3-12.16    As used in this subsection, "third-party provider" means 17any entity that provides fulfillment house services, including 18warehousing, packaging, distribution, order processing, or 19shipment of wine, but not the sale of wine, on behalf of a 20licensed winery shipper. 21    (s) A craft distiller tasting permit license shall allow 22an Illinois licensed class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft 23distiller to transfer a portion of its alcoholic liquor 24inventory from its class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft 25distiller licensed premises to the premises specified in the 26license hereby created and to conduct a sampling, only in the   HB4629- 38 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1premises specified in the license hereby created, of the 2transferred alcoholic liquor in accordance with subsection (c) 3of Section 6-31 of this Act. The transferred alcoholic liquor 4may not be sold or resold in any form. An applicant for the 5craft distiller tasting permit license must also submit with 6the application proof satisfactory to the State Commission 7that the applicant will provide dram shop liability insurance 8to the maximum limits and have local authority approval.9    (t) A brewer warehouse permit may be issued to the holder 10of a class 1 brewer license or a class 2 brewer license. If the 11holder of the permit is a class 1 brewer licensee, the brewer 12warehouse permit shall allow the holder to store or warehouse 13up to 930,000 gallons of tax-determined beer manufactured by 14the holder of the permit at the premises specified on the 15permit. If the holder of the permit is a class 2 brewer 16licensee, the brewer warehouse permit shall allow the holder 17to store or warehouse up to 3,720,000 gallons of 18tax-determined beer manufactured by the holder of the permit 19at the premises specified on the permit. Sales to 20non-licensees are prohibited at the premises specified in the 21brewer warehouse permit. 22    (u) A distilling pub license shall allow the licensee to 23only (i) manufacture up to 5,000 gallons of spirits per year 24only on the premises specified in the license, (ii) make sales 25of the spirits manufactured on the premises or, with the 26approval of the State Commission, spirits manufactured on   HB4629- 39 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1another distilling pub licensed premises that is wholly owned 2and operated by the same licensee to importing distributors 3and distributors and to non-licensees for use and consumption, 4(iii) store the spirits upon the premises, (iv) sell and offer 5for sale at retail from the licensed premises for off-premises 6consumption no more than 5,000 gallons per year so long as such 7sales are only made in-person, (v) sell and offer for sale at 8retail for use and consumption on the premises specified in 9the license any form of alcoholic liquor purchased from a 10licensed distributor or importing distributor, and (vi) with 11the prior approval of the State Commission, annually transfer 12no more than 5,000 gallons of spirits manufactured on the 13premises to a licensed distilling pub wholly owned and 14operated by the same licensee. 15    A distilling pub licensee shall not under any circumstance 16sell or offer for sale spirits manufactured by the distilling 17pub licensee to retail licensees. 18    A person who holds a class 2 craft distiller license may 19simultaneously hold a distilling pub license if the class 2 20craft distiller (i) does not, under any circumstance, sell or 21offer for sale spirits manufactured by the class 2 craft 22distiller to retail licensees; (ii) does not hold more than 3 23distilling pub licenses in this State; (iii) does not 24manufacture more than a combined 100,000 gallons of spirits 25per year, including the spirits manufactured at the distilling 26pub; and (iv) is not a member of or affiliated with, directly   HB4629- 40 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1or indirectly, a manufacturer that produces more than 100,000 2gallons of spirits per year or any other alcoholic liquor. 3    (v) A craft distiller warehouse permit may be issued to 4the holder of a class 1 craft distiller or class 2 craft 5distiller license. The craft distiller warehouse permit shall 6allow the holder to store or warehouse up to 500,000 gallons of 7spirits manufactured by the holder of the permit at the 8premises specified on the permit. Sales to non-licensees are 9prohibited at the premises specified in the craft distiller 10warehouse permit. 11    (w) A beer showcase permit license shall allow an 12Illinois-licensed distributor to transfer a portion of its 13beer inventory from its licensed premises to the premises 14specified in the beer showcase permit license, and, in the 15case of a class 3 brewer, transfer only beer the class 3 brewer 16manufactures from its licensed premises to the premises 17specified in the beer showcase permit license; and to sell or 18offer for sale at retail, only in the premises specified in the 19beer showcase permit license, the transferred or delivered 20beer for on or off premise consumption, but not for resale in 21any form and to sell to non-licensees not more than 96 fluid 22ounces of beer per person. A beer showcase permit license may 23be granted for the following time periods: one day or less; or 242 or more days to a maximum of 15 days per location in any 2512-month period. An applicant for a beer showcase permit 26license must also submit with the application proof   HB4629- 41 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1satisfactory to the State Commission that the applicant will 2provide dram shop liability insurance to the maximum limits 3and have local authority approval. The State Commission shall 4require the beer showcase applicant to comply with Section 56-27.1. 6    (x) A vintage distilled spirits license may be issued to a 7retail licensee as a supplement to the retail license. A 8vintage distilled spirits license shall allow the licensee to 9purchase vintage distilled spirits from a vintage distilled 10spirits seller in accordance with Section 6-40 and to sell 11vintage distilled spirits in accordance with Section 6-40. 12(Source: P.A. 101-16, eff. 6-14-19; 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 13101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-482, eff. 8-23-19; 101-517, eff. 148-23-19; 101-615, eff. 12-20-19; 101-668, eff. 1-1-22; 15102-442, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1142, eff. 2-17-23; revised 167-2-25.) 17    (235 ILCS 5/5-3)  (from Ch. 43, par. 118)18    Sec. 5-3. License fees. Except as otherwise provided 19herein, at the time application is made to the State 20Commission for a license of any class, the applicant shall pay 21to the State Commission the fee hereinafter provided for the 22kind of license applied for.23    The fee for licenses issued by the State Commission shall 24be as follows:25OnlineInitial  HB4629- 42 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1renewallicense2 or3 non-online4 renewal5    For a manufacturer's license:6    Class 1. Distiller .................$4,000$5,0007    Class 2. Rectifier .................4,000 5,0008    Class 3. Brewer ....................1,200 1,5009    Class 4. First-class Wine 10        Manufacturer ...................75090011    Class 5. Second-class12        Wine Manufacturer ..............1,500 1,75013    Class 6. First-class wine-maker ....750 90014    Class 7. Second-class wine-maker ...1,500 1,75015    Class 8. Limited Wine 16        Manufacturer....................250 350 17    Class 9. Craft Distiller........... 2,000 2,500 18    Class 10. Class 1 Craft Distiller.. 50 75 19    Class 11. Class 2 Craft Distiller.. 75 100 20    Class 12. Class 1 Brewer............50 7521    Class 13. Class 2 Brewer........... 75 100 22    Class 14. Class 3 Brewer........... 25 50 23    For a Brew Pub License..............1,2001,50024    For a Distilling Pub License....... 1,200 1,500 25    For a caterer retailer's license....350 50026    For a foreign importer's license ...25 25  HB4629- 43 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1    For an importing distributor's 2        license.........................25253    For a distributor's license 4        (11,250,000 gallons 5        or over).......................1,4502,2006    For a distributor's license 7        (over 4,500,000 gallons, but8        under 11,250,000 gallons)...... 9501,4509    For a distributor's license10        (4,500,000 gallons or under)....30045011    For a non-resident dealer's license12        (500,000 gallons or over) 13        or with self-distribution 14        privileges .....................1,200 1,50015    For a non-resident dealer's license16        (under 500,000 gallons) ........250 35017    For a wine-maker's premises 18        license ........................25050019    For a winery shipper's license20        (under 250,000 gallons).........200 35021    For a winery shipper's license 22        (250,000 or over, but 23        under 500,000 gallons)..........7501,00024    For a winery shipper's license 25        (500,000 gallons or over).......1,200 1,50026    For a wine-maker's premises   HB4629- 44 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1        license, second location .......500 1,0002    For a wine-maker's premises 3        license, third location ........5001,0004    For a retailer's license ...........600 7505    For a special event retailer's6        license, (not-for-profit) ......25 257    For a beer showcase permit, 8        one day only .................. 100 150 9        2 days or more ................ 150 250 10    For a special use permit license,11        one day only ...................100 15012        2 days or more .................150 25013    For a railroad license .............100 15014    For a boat license .................500 1,00015    For an airplane license, times the16        licensee's maximum number of 17        aircraft in flight, serving 18        liquor over the State at any 19        given time, which either 20        originate, terminate, or make 21        an intermediate stop in 22        the State......................10015023    For a non-beverage user's license:24        Class 1 ........................242425        Class 2 ........................606026        Class 3 ........................120120  HB4629- 45 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1        Class 4 ........................2402402        Class 5 ........................6006003    For a broker's license .............750 1,0004    For an auction liquor license ......100 1505    For a homebrewer special 6        event permit....................25257    For a craft distiller 8        tasting permit..................25 259    For a BASSET trainer license....... 300 35010    For a tasting representative 11        license........................20030012    For a brewer warehouse permit...... 252513    For a craft distiller 14        warehouse permit................25 25 15    For a vintage distilled16        spirits license. 300 300 17    Fees collected under this Section shall be paid into the 18Dram Shop Fund. The State Commission shall waive license 19renewal fees for those retailers' licenses that are designated 20as "1A" by the State Commission and expire on or after July 1, 212022, and on or before June 30, 2023. One-half of the funds 22received for a retailer's license shall be paid into the Dram 23Shop Fund and one-half of the funds received for a retailer's 24license shall be paid into the General Revenue Fund.25    No fee shall be paid for licenses issued by the State 26Commission to the following non-beverage users:  HB4629- 46 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1        (a) Hospitals, sanitariums, or clinics when their use 2    of alcoholic liquor is exclusively medicinal, mechanical, 3    or scientific.4        (b) Universities, colleges of learning, or schools 5    when their use of alcoholic liquor is exclusively 6    medicinal, mechanical, or scientific.7        (c) Laboratories when their use is exclusively for the 8    purpose of scientific research.9(Source: P.A. 102-442, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 10102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1142, eff. 2-17-23; 103-154, eff. 116-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 12    (235 ILCS 5/6-40 new)13    Sec. 6-40. Vintage distilled spirits sales.14    (a) As used in this Section:15    "Vintage distilled spirits" means a private selection 16package or a package or packages of distilled spirits that (i) 17are in their original manufacturer's unopened container, (ii) 18are not owned by a distillery, and (iii) are not otherwise 19available for purchase from a licensed wholesaler within this 20State.21    "Vintage distilled spirits seller" means a non-licensed 22person at least 21 years of age who is:23        (1) an administrator, executor, receiver, or other 24    fiduciary who receives and sells vintage distilled spirits 25    in execution of the person's fiduciary capacity;  HB4629- 47 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1        (2) a creditor who receives or takes possession of 2    vintage distilled spirits as security for, or in payment 3    of, debt, in whole or in part;4        (3) a public officer or court official who levies on 5    vintage distilled spirits under order or process of any 6    court or magistrate to sell the vintage distilled spirits 7    in satisfaction of the order or process; or8        (4) any other person not engaged in the business of 9    selling alcoholic beverages.10    (b) A vintage distilled spirits license may be issued as a 11supplementary license to a retail licensee.12    (c) A vintage distilled spirits licensee shall file a 13monthly report with the State Commission, which shall be 14established and maintained by the State Commission, using a 15form prescribed by the State Commission that includes the 16following information:17        (1) the number of vintage distilled spirits packages 18    purchased in the preceding 30 days in total, with each 19    purchase matched to the individual from whom the vintage 20    distilled spirits were purchased;21        (2) the date of each purchase;22        (3) the name, address, and phone number of each 23    individual from whom vintage distilled spirits were 24    purchased;25        (4) a detailed description of the vintage distilled 26    spirits purchased, including the brand name and the size   HB4629- 48 -LRB104 15791 RPS 28984 b1    of the packages; and2        (5) the number of vintage distilled spirits packages 3    that the licensee has previously purchased from the same 4    individual and the dates of those purchases.5    (d) Vintage distilled spirits licensees shall purchase all 6vintage distilled spirits in person at their licensed 7premises, and at the time of purchase, the vintage distilled 8spirits licensee shall immediately place a conspicuous 9sticker, not readily removable, on the bottle or container 10that states "Vintage Distilled Spirit.".11    (e) Vintage distilled spirits may be resold only by the 12drink by a vintage distilled spirits licensee with an 13on-premises retail license and by the package by a vintage 14distilled spirits licensee with an off-premises retail 15license.16    (f) A vintage distilled spirits licensee shall not 17purchase more than 24 vintage distilled spirits packages from 18any single vintage distilled spirits seller in any given 1912-month period.20    (g) A vintage distilled spirits seller shall not sell more 21than 24 vintage distilled spirits packages to any single or 22combination of vintage distilled spirits licensees in any 23given 12-month period. A vintage distilled spirits seller who 24violates this subsection shall be subject to a fine of $500 for 25a first offense, $2,500 for a second offense, and $5,000 for a 26third or subsequent offense.